Vermont, session 2025-2026, H60.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 4501 is amended to read:
§ 4501. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #379094 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.60
2025 Page 2 of 7
(14) “Immunization status” means an individual’s immunization history,
including whether an individual has received a vaccination against one or more
infectious diseases.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONS
(a) An owner or operator of a place of public accommodation or an agent
or employee of such owner or operator shall not, because of the race, creed,
color, national origin, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity,
or immunization status of any person, refuse, withhold from, or deny to that
person any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, and privileges of the
place of public accommodation.
* * *
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. § 4503 is amended to read:
§ 4503. UNFAIR HOUSING PRACTICES
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent, or refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental
of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling or other real estate to
any person because of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, immunization status, or
disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with
VT LEG #379094 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.60
2025 Page 3 of 7
one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public
assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(2) To discriminate against, or to harass, any person in the terms,
conditions, privileges, and protections of the sale or rental of a dwelling or
other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with
a dwelling or other real estate, because of the race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
immunization status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to
occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a
recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking.
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published
any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a
dwelling or other real estate that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, immunization status, or
disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with
one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public
assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(4) To represent to any person because of the race, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national
VT LEG #379094 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.60
2025 Page 4 of 7
origin, immunization status, or disability of a person, or because a person
intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a
person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of
abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, that any dwelling or other real estate is not
available for inspection, sale, or rental when the dwelling or real estate is in
fact so available.
* * *
(6) To discriminate against any person in the making or purchasing of
loans or providing other financial assistance for real-estate-related transactions
or in the selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property, because
of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status,
religious creed, color, national origin, immunization status, or disability of a
person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more
minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or
because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(7) To engage in blockbusting practices, for profit, which may include
inducing or attempting to induce a person to sell or rent a dwelling by
representations regarding the entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons of a particular race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, immunization status, or
disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with
VT LEG #379094 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.60
2025 Page 5 of 7
one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public
assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(8) To deny any person access to or membership or participation in any
multiple listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service,
organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings,
or to discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such access,
membership, or participation, on account of race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
immunization status, or disability of a person, or because a person is a recipient
of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
* * *
(12) To discriminate in land use decisions or in the permitting of
housing because of race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital
status, religious creed, color, national origin, immunization status, disability,
the presence of one or more minor children, income, or because of the receipt
of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking, except as otherwise provided by law.
* * *
VT LEG #379094 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.60
2025 Page 6 of 7
Sec. 4. 21 V.S.A. § 495 is amended to read:
§ 495. UNLAWFUL EMPLOYMENT PRACTICE
(a) It shall be unlawful employment practice, except where a bona fide
occupational qualification requires persons individuals of a particular race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, place of birth, age, crime victim status, immunization status, or
physical or mental condition:
(1) For any employer, employment agency, or labor organization to
harass or discriminate against any individual because of race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, place of birth,
crime victim status, immunization status, or age or against a qualified
individual with a disability.
(2) For any person individual seeking employees or for any employment
agency or labor organization to cause to be printed, published, or circulated
any notice or advertisement relating to employment or membership indicating
any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based upon race,
color, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, place of birth, crime victim status, immunization status, age, or
disability.
(3) For any employment agency to fail or refuse to classify properly or
refer for employment or to otherwise harass or discriminate against any
VT LEG #379094 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.60
2025 Page 7 of 7
individual because of race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, place of birth, crime victim status, immunization
status, or age or against a qualified individual with a disability.
(4) For any labor organization to limit, segregate, or qualify its
membership with respect to any individual because of race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, place of birth,
crime victim status, immunization status, or age or against a qualified
individual with a disability.
* * *
Sec. 5. 21 V.S.A. § 495d is amended to read:
§ 495d. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(18) “Immunization status” means an individual’s immunization history,
including whether an individual has received a vaccination against one or more
infectious diseases.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379094 v.1